Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1318
Employees; benefits; retirement value; how computed.

The retirement value for any employee who retires under the provisions of section 84-1317 shall be (1) for participants in the defined contribution benefit, the sum of the employee's employee account and employer account as of the date of final account value and (2) for participants in the cash balance benefit, the benefit provided in section 84-1309.02 as of the date of final account value.

Laws 1963, c. 532, § 18, p. 1674;

Laws 2002, LB 687, § 26;

Laws 2003, LB 451, § 28.